Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 5. Contract Review, Approval, and Termination.

Sec. 43.82.400.
Preliminary findings and determination regarding the contract.

If the commissioner develops a proposed contract under AS

43.82.200

—

43.82.270

, the commissioner shall

make preliminary findings and a determination that the proposed contract terms are in the long-term fiscal interests of the state and further the purposes of this chapter; and

prepare a proposed contract that includes those terms and shall submit the contract to the governor.

To make the preliminary findings and determination required by (a)(1) of this section, the commissioner shall compare the projected public revenue anticipated from the approved qualified project with the estimated operating and capital costs of the additional state and municipal services anticipated to arise from the construction and operation of the approved qualified project. The commissioner shall address the reasonably foreseeable effects of the proposed contract on the public revenue.

In conjunction with the making of preliminary findings and determination required by (a)(1) of this section, the commissioner shall describe the principal factors, including the projected price of gas, projected production rate or volume of gas, and projected recovery, development, construction, and operating costs, upon which the determination made under (a)(1) of this section is based. If the commissioner has previously submitted a proposed contract to the governor, the commissioner shall describe any material differences between the terms of the currently proposed contract and the previously proposed contract.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.410.
Notice and comment regarding the contract.

The commissioner shall

give reasonable public notice of the preliminary findings and determination made under AS

43.82.400

;

make copies of the proposed contract, the commissioner’s preliminary findings and determination, and, to the extent the information is not required to be kept confidential under AS

43.82.310

, the supporting financial, technical, and market data, including the work papers, analyses, and recommendations of any independent contractors used under AS

43.82.240

available to the public and to

the presiding officer of each house of the legislature;

the chairs of the finance and resources committees of the legislature; and

the chairs of the special committees on oil and gas, if any, of the legislature;

offer to appear before the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee to provide the committee a review of the commissioner’s preliminary findings and determination, the proposed contract, and the supporting financial, technical, and market data; if the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee accepts the commissioner’s offer, the committee shall give notice of the committee’s meeting to the public and all members of the legislature; if the financial, technical, and market data that is to be provided must be kept confidential under AS

43.82.310

, the commissioner may not release the confidential information during a public portion of a committee meeting; and

establish a period of at least 30 days for the public and members of the legislature to comment on the proposed contract and the preliminary findings and determination made under AS

43.82.400

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.420.
Coordination of public and legislative review.

To the extent practicable, the commissioner shall coordinate the public comment opportunity provided under AS

43.82.410

(4) with a review by the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee under AS

43.82.410

(3).

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.430.
Final findings, determination, and proposed amendments; execution of the contract.

Within 30 days after the close of the public comment period under AS

43.82.410

(4), the commissioner of revenue shall

prepare a summary of the public comments received in response to the proposed contract and the preliminary findings and determination;

after consultation with the commissioner of natural resources, if appropriate, and with the pertinent municipal advisory group established under AS

43.82.510

, prepare a list of proposed amendments, if any, to the proposed contract that the commissioner of revenue determines are necessary to respond to public comments;

make final findings and a determination as to whether the proposed contract and any proposed amendments prepared under (2) of this subsection meet the requirements and purposes of this chapter.

After considering the material described in (a) of this section and securing the agreement of the other parties to the proposed contract regarding any proposed amendments prepared under (a) of this section, if the commissioner determines that the contract is in the long-term fiscal interests of the state, the commissioner shall submit the contract to the governor.

The commissioner’s final findings and determination under (a) of this section are final agency decisions under this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.435.
Legislative authorization.

The governor may transmit a contract developed under this chapter to the legislature together with a request for authorization to execute the contract. A contract developed under this chapter is not binding upon or enforceable against the state or other parties to the contract unless the governor is authorized to execute the contract by law. The state and the other parties to the contract may execute the contract within 60 days after the effective date of the law authorizing the contract.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.440.
Judicial review.

A person may not bring an action challenging the constitutionality of a law authorizing a contract enacted under AS

43.82.435

or the enforceability of a contract executed under a law authorizing a contract enacted under AS

43.82.435

unless the action is commenced within 120 days after the date that the contract was executed by the state and the other parties to the contract.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)

Sec. 43.82.445.
Administrative termination of a contract.

The commissioner shall include terms in a contract developed under AS

43.82.020

that provide for administrative termination of a party’s rights under the procedures and conditions set out in this section if the party has

ceased to meet the requirements of AS

43.82.110

as a qualified sponsor or qualified sponsor group;

intentionally or fraudulently misrepresented, in whole or in part, material facts or circumstances upon which the contract was made;

failed to comply with a condition or material term of the contract or a provision of this chapter; or

failed to comply with the approved qualified project plan or any updated project plan.

Before administrative termination of a contract under this section, the commissioner shall give notice to the parties of the commissioner’s intent to terminate the contract and an opportunity to be heard. The commissioner may also provide the parties an opportunity to cure any deficiency that is the basis for the termination if the commissioner determines that curing the deficiency is appropriate under the circumstances.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, the commissioner may not administratively terminate a contract after the party has committed full project funding except as provided in (e) of this section.

A party to a contract who is affected by the commissioner’s action to terminate under (a) of this section may file an appeal with the superior court under the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

The commissioner may provide terms and conditions in a contract developed under AS

43.82.020

upon which a party’s rights under the contract may be administratively terminated after the party commits full project funding.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1998)